Wisconsin, session 2025, AB852.
do enact as follows:AB852,11Section 1. 20.115 (7) (dm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB852,2,4220.115 (7) (dm) Farmland preservation planning and implementation grants. 3The amounts in the schedule for farmland preservation planning grants under s. 491.10 (6) and for farmland preservation implementation grants under s. 91.10 (7).AB852,25Section 2. 20.115 (7) (tm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB852,2,9620.115 (7) (tm) Farmland preservation planning and implementation grants, 7working lands fund. From the working lands fund, the amounts in the schedule for 8farmland preservation planning grants under s. 91.10 (6) and for farmland 9preservation implementation grants under s. 91.10 (7).AB852,310Section 3. 71.613 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB852,3,41171.613 (2) Filing claims. (intro.) Subject to sub. (2e) and to the limitations 12and conditions provided in sub. (3), a claimant may claim as a credit against the tax 13imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, an amount calculated by multiplying the 14claimant’s qualifying acres by one of the following amounts, and if the allowable 15amount of the claim exceeds the income taxes otherwise due on the claimant’s 16income or if there are no Wisconsin income taxes due on the claimant’s income, the 1amount of the claim not used as an offset against income taxes shall be certified by 2the department of revenue to the department of administration for payment to the 3claimant by check, share draft, or other draft from the appropriation under s. 420.835 (2) (do):AB852,45Section 4. 71.613 (2e) of the statutes is created to read:AB852,3,19671.613 (2e) Indexing for inflation. (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and 7(c), in August 2026, and every August thereafter, the department, in consultation 8with the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection, shall increase 9the dollar amounts in sub. (2) (am), (bm), (cm), and (d) by a percentage equal to the 10percentage change over the previous 12 months of an index of prices paid by 11farmers, as determined by the national agricultural statistics service of the U.S. 12department of agriculture. The adjustment may occur only if the resulting dollar 13amounts are greater than the corresponding amounts that were calculated for the 14previous year. If an adjustment is not made in a previous year due to a negative 15change in the index, any subsequent adjustment shall be based on the percentage 16change in the index since August of the year that an adjustment under this 17paragraph last occurred, except that following a negative change in the index, no 18adjustment may occur under this paragraph until the current level of the index 19exceeds the highest level that the index had previously reached.AB852,4,620(b) Except as provided in par. (c), in August 2026, and every August 21thereafter, if the department is unable to make the adjustment described in par. (a) 22for a reason other than the resulting dollar amounts not being greater than the 23corresponding amounts calculated for the previous year, the department shall 1increase the dollar amounts in sub. (2) (am), (bm), (cm), and (d) by a percentage 2equal to the percentage change over the previous 12 months of the consumer price 3index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as determined by the U.S. 4department of labor. The adjustment may occur only if the resulting dollar 5amounts are greater than the corresponding amounts that were calculated for the 6previous year.AB852,4,107(c) For the first increase described under this subsection in August 2026, the 8department shall increase the dollar amounts in sub. (2) (am), (bm), (cm), and (d) 9based on the percentage change of the index used by the department for the period 10between January 2023 and August 2026.AB852,511Section 5. 91.10 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB852,4,171291.10 (7) (a) From the appropriation under s. 20.115 (7) (dm) or (tm), the 13department may award a grant to a city, village, town, county, regional planning 14commission, or tribal government to implement a county’s certified farmland 15preservation plan. In determining priorities for awarding grants under this 16paragraph and under sub. (6) (a), the department shall first consider applications 17for grants under sub. (6) (a).AB852,4,2018(b) The department may award an implementation grant under par. (a) for the 19costs of any of the following activities in an area that is planned for farmland 20preservation in a county’s certified farmland preservation plan:AB852,4,22211. Certifying a farmland preservation zoning ordinance under s. 91.36 for the 22first time.AB852,4,23232. Entering into farmland preservation agreements under s. 91.60.AB852,5,313. Designating an agricultural enterprise area under s. 91.84 or developing a 2project to facilitate agricultural preservation and development if the project is in a 3designated agricultural enterprise area under s. 91.84.AB852,5,444. Monitoring compliance under s. 91.82.AB852,5,655. Targeted outreach for the farmland preservation program under this 6chapter.AB852,5,137(c) The department shall enter into a contract with a city, village, town, 8county, regional planning commission, or tribal government to which it awards an 9implementation grant under par. (a) before the department distributes any grant 10funds to the recipient. In the contract, the department shall identify the costs for 11the activities under par. (b) that are eligible for reimbursement through the grant 12and a benchmark of activities that the recipient must complete before the 13department will distribute more than 50 percent of the grant funds.AB852,5,1914(d) The department may distribute grant funds under this subsection only 15after the city, village, town, county, regional planning commission, or tribal 16government shows that it has incurred costs that are eligible for reimbursement 17under par. (c). The department may not distribute more than 50 percent of the 18amount of a grant under par. (a) for an implementation project before the recipient 19completes the benchmark identified in the contract under par. (c).AB852,5,2220(e) The department may require the recipient of an implementation grant 21under par. (a) to contribute matching funds of up to 50 percent of the amount of the 22grant.AB852,6,21(f) The department may consider the following factors when awarding grants 2under par. (a):AB852,6,531. The applicant’s demonstrated commitment to implementing the county’s 4certified farmland preservation plan and the strength of documentation supporting 5the plan.AB852,6,862. The applicant’s demonstrated commitment and capacity to implement and 7maintain farm conservation practices established in rules promulgated by the 8department under ss. 92.05 (3) (c) and (k), 92.14 (8), and 281.16 (3) (b) and (c).AB852,6,1193. The likelihood that activities funded by the grant will address goals in the 10county’s certified farmland preservation plan or grow local participation in the 11farmland preservation program under this chapter.AB852,6,13124. The relative cost-effectiveness of activities funded by the grant in locally 13implementing the farmland preservation program under this chapter.AB852,6,14145. The timeliness and completeness of plans and applications.AB852,6,16156. The applicant’s demonstrated cooperation and commitment to manage and 16implement funded projects.AB852,6,19177. A county’s annual financial contribution for soil and water resource 18management programs or funding awarded to county land conservation committees 19as part of an annual grant under s. 92.14.AB852,6,21208. Any other factor relevant to administering the grant program under this 21subsection.AB852,622Section 6. 91.84 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB852,7,2191.84 (1) (b) The department may designate agricultural enterprise areas 2with a combined area of not more than 2,000,000 3,000,000 acres of land.AB852,73Section 7. Initial applicability.AB852,7,64(1) Indexing farmland preservation tax credit for inflation. The 5treatment of s. 71.613 (2) (intro.) and (2e) first applies to taxable years beginning on 6January 1, 2026.AB852,7,77